Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-3421
Practice of engineering, defined.

(1) Practice of engineering means any service or creative work that requires engineering education, training, and experience in the application of special knowledge of the mathematical, physical, and engineering sciences. The services may include, but not be limited to, planning, providing studies, designs, drawings, specifications, and other technical submissions, and administering construction contracts. The practice of engineering does not include the practice of architecture.

(2) A person shall be construed to practice engineering, within the meaning and intent of the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act, if he or she:

(a) Practices any discipline of the profession of engineering or holds himself or herself out as able and entitled to practice any discipline of engineering;

(b) By verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead, or card or in any other way, represents himself or herself to be a professional engineer; or

(c) Through the use of some other title, implies that he or she is a professional engineer or licensed under the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 21;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 19.